Hawaii statutes.
§346-239 Required findings concerning
postponed hearings. Except as otherwise provided, no hearing shall be
delayed upon the grounds that a party other than the vulnerable adult is not
present at the hearing or has not been served with a copy of the order for
immediate protection or the petition, where reasonable efforts have been made
to effect service and it would be detrimental to the vulnerable adult to
postpone the proceedings until service can be made. Whenever a hearing is
delayed or postponed under this section, the court shall enter a finding that
it will not be detrimental to the vulnerable adult and shall also specify what
additional measures shall be undertaken to effect service. [L 1989, c 381, pt
of §1; am L 1990, c 144, §1 and c 234, §9; am L 2008, c 154, §20]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next